Illinois, session 104th, HB270.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Premises Liability Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 130/1)  (from Ch. 80, par. 301)7    Sec. 1. This Act is called and and may be cited as the 8"Premises Liability Act". 9(Source: P.A. 83-1398.)